Hawaii statutes.
[§321‑1.8] Inspections;
public notice. (a) Beginning with inspections occurring on January 1,
2015, the department of health shall post on its website electronic copies of
reports for all inspections it performs of the following state-licensed care
facilities:

(1) Adult day health centers;

(2) Adult day care centers;

(3) Community care foster family homes;

(4) Developmental
disabilities domiciliary homes as defined in section 321‑15.9;

(5) Developmentally disabled adult foster homes;

(6) Long-term care facilities as defined in section
349‑21(f); and

(7) Special treatment facilities as defined in
section 334‑1.

(b) Each report shall be posted on the
department of health's website within five working days of the conclusion of
each inspection and shall include the following information:

(1) The date of the inspection;

(2) A description of violations of relevant state
laws or rules, if applicable;

(3) Plans of correction and the status of corrective
actions in response to any violations, if applicable;

(4) A list and description of all corrective actions
taken by the facility, if applicable, to be submitted by the facility and added
to the report at a later time, as determined by the department; and

(5) Other information regarding the quality and
conditions of the facility the department of health deems appropriate.

(c) Each report posted on the department of
health's website that reports a violation committed by a state-licensed care
facility as described in subsection (a) shall be removed from the website after
three years from the date the report was posted. [L 2013, c 213, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next